Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1204
Job training grant; approval; limitations.

The Department of Economic Development shall not approve a job training grant which exceeds an average expenditure of five thousand dollars per job created if the proposed wage levels do not exceed thirty thousand dollars per year, which exceeds an average expenditure of ten thousand dollars per job if the proposed wage levels exceed thirty thousand dollars per year but do not exceed fifty thousand dollars per year, or which exceeds an average expenditure of twenty thousand dollars per job if the proposed wage levels exceed fifty thousand dollars per year.

Laws 1995, LB 326, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 28;

Laws 2014, LB906, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 187.
December 31, 2026